Arkansas, session 2025, HB1367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-103-417, concerning access to public
records under the Arkansas Title Insurance Act, is amended to add additional
subsections to read as follows:
(e)(1) If a city, county, or state government or government official
maintains, compiles, or keeps instruments of record affecting real property
in electronic format or as an electronic record as defined in § 14-14-111,
whether or not kept by the city, county, or state government or government
official directly or through a third-party provider, the city, county, or
state government or government official shall provide the instruments of
record affecting real property in their electronic format and in the time
required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section to
a:
(A) Title insurance agent;
(B) Title insurance agency; or
(C) Person affiliated with a title insurance agency.
*ANS187*
03-06-2025 09:26:22 ANS187

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 H3/4/25 H3/6/25 HB1367
(2) An instrument of record affecting real estate that is
provided under subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall not bear any
watermark or other notation that does not appear on the original record.
(3) A reasonable fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars
($150) per month may be charged for providing the instruments under
subdivision (e)(1) of this section.
(f) If a city, county, or state government or government official that
maintains, compiles, or keeps instruments of record affecting real property
does not maintain instruments in electronic format or as an electronic
record, then the city, county, or state government or government official
shall provide the instruments of record affecting real property in the form
of a mechanical reproduction in the time required under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section to a:
(1) Title insurance agent;
(2) Title insurance agency; or
(3) Person affiliated with a title insurance agency.
/s/Warren



















03-06-2025 09:26:22 ANS187